Louisiana, session 2026, HB407.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:3047.2(A)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3047.2. Initial eligibility
A. To be initially eligible for the award, an applicant shall meet the
following requirements:
(1)(a) Meet the following minimum age requirements:
(a) (i) Be at least twenty years old in the 2024-2025 award year.
(b) (ii) Be at least nineteen years old in the 2025-2026 award year.
(c) (iii) Be at least eighteen twenty-one years old in the 2026-2027 award
year. and 2027-2028 award years.
(d) (iv) Be at least seventeen eighteen years old in the 2027-2028 2028-2029
award year and thereafter.
(v) Be at least seventeen years old in the 2029-2030 award year and
thereafter.
(b) A recipient who is initially eligible pursuant to Item (a)(i) or (a)(ii) of this
Paragraph shall continue to be eligible, so long as the recipient meets all other
requirements of R.S. 17:3047.3.
* * *
Section 2. The administering agency of the M.J. Foster Promise Program shall
submit a report to the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 407 ENROLLED
Education no later than January 1, 2028, that includes but need not be limited to the
following information relative to the program since its enactment:
(1) The number of award applicants and recipients.
(2) The average age of recipients.
(3) The fiscal impact of the minimum age requirements.
(4) Any projected cost savings or reallocations within the program.
(5) Recommendations relative to whether minimum age requirements should be
continued, modified, or allowed to expire.
Section 3. The provisions of this Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.